California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The commission shall submit to the secretary for his or her concurrence an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71089.

(a) The commission and the secretary shall keep confidential and shall not disclose, except when required by court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding, all lists in their possession of persons subject to this chapter. However, the commission shall establish procedures to provide access to communication with other producers and handlers regarding noncommercial matters affecting the commission and persons subject to its jurisdiction. The access shall not include the actual release of the list of the names and addresses of producers and handlers in the possession of the commission or the secretary. In addition, notwithstanding any other provision of law, all proprietary or trade secret
 information developed or gathered pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, names and addresses of handlers, producers, processors, wholesalers, retailers, brokers, and shippers, individual quantities produced, handled, shipped, bought or sold, prices paid, and the products of research obtained by the commission, or by the department on behalf of the commission, from any source is confidential and shall not be considered a public record as that term is defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code.

(b) Upon receipt of a request for information from a person establishing cause for the request, the department shall direct the commission to provide the requesting person any record in the commission’s possession, except that any proprietary information shall be removed before disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 131.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

71090.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71091.

The commission may appoint any person to serve as an ex officio member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [71100. - 71107.]

71100.

(a) Within 15 days of a request from any handler or producer, the secretary shall establish a list of handlers and producers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. The secretary may require handlers and producers to submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers and handlers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include information on the volume of rice handled by each handler, or produced by each producer or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in Section 71101. The request for the information shall be in writing and shall be filed within 10 days following receipt of the request.

(b) Any handler or producer eligible to vote whose name does not appear on the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a person eligible to vote. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the person from paying assessments and does not invalidate any industry votes conducted pursuant to this article.

(c) Any handler or producer eligible to vote may contact those on the list regarding the referendum in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary if all expenses associated with those contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71101.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds the following in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary:

(a) At least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of rice handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of rice handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(b) At least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting produced a majority of the total quantity of rice produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting produced 65 percent or more of the total quantity of rice produced by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71102.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71103.

Nonreceipt of a ballot by an eligible handler or producer shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71104.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 71101, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all affected handlers and producers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71105.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 71101, the secretary shall certify and declare all provisions of this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct other implementation referendum votes one year or more after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71106.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall terminate, effective at the end of the marketing season then current, consistent with the terms of the marketing order and Section 59088, any entity operating pursuant to an existing state marketing order affecting the same subject matter as this chapter. Notwithstanding the terms of the marketing order, or any provision of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2 of Division 21, the secretary shall immediately upon certification of the commission, order the transfer of the marketing order’s assets to the commission, except for those assets necessary to the proper winding up of the marketing orders affairs. This section shall not affect the continued operation of any existing rice research marketing order directly affecting producers of rice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71107.

(a) Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to this article, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out Section 71101 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [71120. - 71138.]

71120.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the marketing season not later than September 1 of each year or as soon thereafter as is possible. The assessment shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) per hundredweight for rice delivered to handlers by producers. Of the assessment, not more than five cents ($0.05) per hundredweight shall be assessed against handlers, and not more than five cents ($0.05) per hundredweight shall be assessed against producers. The assessment rate shall be the same for handlers and producers.

(b) An assessment greater than the amount specified in subdivision (a) may not be charged unless approved by a majority of the commission and by handlers and producers pursuant to procedures specified in Section 71101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71121.

(a) This chapter does not apply to handlers of less than 100,000 hundredweight in any marketing season or to rice produced only for a producer’s home use or rice that is used only for ornamental purposes.

(b) If at any time during a marketing season the volume handled by a handler reaches 100,000 hundredweight or more, the handler shall be assessed for the initial 100,000 hundredweight and any additional volume handled during the marketing season. If the assessments on the initial 100,000 hundredweight are paid in the time and manner specified by the commission, the assessments shall not be considered past due.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 71026, the 100,000 hundredweight threshold established pursuant to this chapter shall remain in effect unless a higher threshold is approved by a majority of the commission and by those handlers remaining eligible under the proposed threshold and producers pursuant to procedures specified in Section 71101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71122.

Any person requesting an exemption from this chapter shall file an affidavit with the commission attesting that he or she is not a handler, as defined in Section 71026, or produces rice only for his or her own home use or for ornamental purposes. The affidavit shall contain all the information required by the commission. The commission shall review the affidavit, conduct any additional investigation it deems appropriate, and approve or deny the affidavit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71123.

Every person who handles rice in any quantity shall keep a complete and accurate record of all transactions involving the purchase or sale of rice and shall submit the record to the commission in the time and manner specified by the commission. The records shall be in a simple form and contain the information that the commission prescribes. The records shall be preserved by the handler for a period of three years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71124.

(a) All proprietary information obtained or developed pursuant to this article by the commission or the secretary from any source, including, but not limited to, the names and addresses of producers, is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding.

(b) Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission, or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that gives only totals, but excludes individual information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71125.

Any assessment that is levied as provided for in this chapter is a personal debt of every person assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71126.

(a) Only the first handler of rice is subject to the handler assessment and shall deduct the producer assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer and shall be a trustee of these assessments and assessments required to be paid by the handler until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission. Title to the assessments shall pass immediately to the commission and handlers shall hold the assessments in trust for the benefit of the commission and shall remit them, with assessment reports, in the time and manner specified by the commission. All first handlers, without regard to the volume handled, shall deduct and remit the producer assessment. Failure to collect the assessment from any producer shall not exempt the handler from liability. In addition, failure of a handler to remit the collected producer assessments to the commission shall not relieve the producer of this obligation.

(b) If rice is forfeited under a loan from the Commodity Credit Corporation, the handler shall pay both the producer and handler assessments if the rice is contracted to the handler. If the handler’s total volume for the marketing season is less than 100,000 hundredweight, only the producer assessment shall apply. If the rice forfeited under a loan from the Commodity Credit Corporation is not contracted to a handler, the producer shall pay both the handler and producer assessments. If the total volume handled by the producer during the marketing season is less than 100,000 hundredweight, only the producer assessment shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71127.

When the handler or producer is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for violating this chapter, including, but not limited to, failing to pay assessments or file required reports, shall also include identical liability upon each director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71128.

Any person who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due, and, in addition, shall pay 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71129.

In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require any person who fails to pay an assessment or related charge pursuant to this article to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount, and for a period of time, specified by the commission as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71130.

It is a violation of state law for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Fail to render or furnish a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71131.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for that purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71132.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding rice until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71133.

Any action by the commission for any violation of this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. Any action against the commission by any person shall be commenced within two years from the date of the act of which the person complains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71134.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71135.

(a) (1) Every five years, commencing with the fifth marketing season following the certification pursuant to Section 71104, the secretary shall conduct a referendum among handlers and producers. The operations of the commission shall continue unless the secretary determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible handlers and a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of terminating the operations of this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the commission
 issues a declaration pursuant to Section 71050.5 and that declaration is in effect at the time that the secretary conducts a referendum pursuant to this section, a person shall be eligible to vote in the referendum conducted pursuant to this section if either of the following apply:

(A) The person is a producer or handler.

(B) The person is eligible to serve on the commission as a producer or handler member pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of, or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (a) of Section 71050.5.

(b) If the secretary finds that the vote favors continuation, the
 secretary
 shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that the vote favors termination, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the then current marketing season. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed as provided in Section 71137.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 84, Sec. 4.   (AB 454)   Effective July 21, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71136.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the then current marketing season.

(b) Upon the vote of the members of the commission specified in subdivision (a), the secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. The secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter if he or she finds any of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of rice handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of rice handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(3) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting produced a majority of the total quantity of rice produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(4) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting produced 65 percent or more of the total quantity of rice produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71137.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and all moneys held by the commission not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the prorated refund to these persons, any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state or federal program conducted or used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter. Upon suspension, any intellectual property owned by the commission shall be transferred without charge to the secretary who shall hold the property in trust for the benefit of the California rice industry. The property shall be transferred without charge to any successor program serving purposes similar to the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71138.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all eligible persons affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. California Wheat Commission [72001. - 72135.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [72001. - 72008.]

72001.

The wheat industry in this state is expanding rapidly. It provides over three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) in farm income annually, increased by almost 20 percent in 1981, and is expected to show continued growth in the future. It is one of California’s five biggest agricultural exports. In total production, the state is among the top 10 states nationwide. The industry is a major employer of agricultural labor and is also a source of employment in the transportation, warehousing, and shipping industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72002.

Opportunity exists for continued expansion, particularly if the industry can develop better varieties more suited to the California climate and the needs of the marketplace. The unique qualities of California wheat need to be promoted to foreign buyers, who purchase most of the wheat grown in this state. Opportunity also exists for increasing sales to domestic customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72003.

The establishment of a California Wheat Commission is necessary for the efficient development and management of an international sales promotion program, and is essential to ensure that the California wheat industry can compete successfully in the marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72004.

A commission is also necessary to conduct research into the development of varieties more suitable to the export trade, as well as more productive under California growing conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72005.

A California Wheat Commission would also be the means for California producers to take a more active role in national wheat organizations and wheat policymaking bodies. Producers in this state lack effective input at the national level, while producers in all other major wheat-growing states have this advantage through their own state commissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72006.

The production and marketing of wheat produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72007.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, marketing research, and production research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72008.

No action taken by the commission, nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with rules or regulations adopted under the chapter, shall be deemed a violation of the Cartwright Act, the Unfair Practices Act, the Fair Trade Act, or any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [72021. - 72034.]

72021.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72022.

“Wheat” means any variety of wheat produced in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72023.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72024.

“Commission” means the California Wheat Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72025.

“Commissioner” means any member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72026.

“Director” means the Director of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72027.

“Districts” shall consist of the following:

(a) District 1 consists of Siskiyou, Tehama, Lassen, Modoc, and Shasta Counties.

(b) District 2 consists of Butte, Colusa, Glenn, and Lake Counties.

(c) District 3 consists of Napa, Sonoma, Yolo, Amador, El Dorado, Placer, Yuba, Nevada, Sutter, and Sierra Counties and that portion of Sacramento County lying north of Road J-11 and east of the Sacramento River from Walnut Grove to Courtland.

(d) District 4 consists of Solano County and that portion of Sacramento County not included in District 3.

(e) District 5 consists of Alameda, Contra Costa, Stanislaus, and San Joaquin Counties.

(f) District 6 consists of Merced and Madera Counties.

(g) District 7 consists of Fresno County.

(h) District 8 consists of Kings and Tulare Counties.

(i) District 9 consists of Kern County.

(j) District 10 consists of Santa Barbara, San Luis Obispo, Monterey, and San Benito Counties.

(k) District 11 consists of San Bernardino, Riverside, San Diego, Los Angeles and Ventura Counties.

(l) District 12 consists of that
 part of Imperial County lying north of Keystone Road.

(m) District 13 consists of that part of Imperial County lying south of Keystone Road.

The number of districts and boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the commission, as long as proper notice is provided to all persons subject to this chapter and the action of the commission is concurred in by the secretary, to ensure proper representation by producers. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.   (AB 735)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

72028.

“Ex officio member” shall be a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72029.

“Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler as defined in Section 72030.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72030.

“Handler” means any person who engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing wheat which he or she has produced, purchased, or acquired from a producer, or which he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. When the handler is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payments or assessments of which a corporate handler may be subject pursuant to this chapter shall include identical liability upon each individual director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 16.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72030.5.

“Handler” also means any lienholder, secured party or pledgee that is a public agency, public or private, or assignee of a lienholder, secured party or pledgee that is a public agency, who is authorized to gain title to the wheat from the producer through the exercise of specified legal rights, including, but not limited to, a federal nonrecourse loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 17.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72031.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale of wheat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72032.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning May 1 of any year and extending through April 30 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 18.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72033.

“Producer” or “grower” means any person who is engaged, within this state, in the business of producing wheat for market during any of the preceding three marketing seasons, and who shall, upon request, provide proof of commodity sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 19.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72034.

“Production research” means any research related to the production and processing of wheat, other than marketing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Wheat Commission [72051. - 72065.]

72051.

There is in the state government the California Wheat Commission. The commission shall be composed of 13 members who are wheat producers and who are not handlers, two members who are handlers, two at-large members, and one public member. The producers, one from each district, shall be elected by and from producers within the respective districts. The two handler members shall be elected by and from handlers doing business within the state.

The at-large members and the public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from the nominees recommended by the commission. Each at-large member shall be a person with knowledge, expertise, and interest in wheat production, handling, research, or any other attribute or attributes that are deemed by the secretary
 to be of value to the purpose of the commission.

The secretary and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission shall be nonvoting ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 735)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

72052.

The director may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function which is determined by the director not to be in the public interest or is in violation of this chapter.

If the commission refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make such corrections as required by the director, the director may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities of the commission until that time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the director has been accomplished by the commission.

Actions of the commission in violation of that written notice shall be without legal force or effect.

The director, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

Upon service of the written notice, the director shall notify the commission, in writing, of the specific acts which he determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter and his reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific activities or functions, and may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable to the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72052.5.

When the director is required to determine whether or not to concur with a decision of the commission, he shall indicate his response to the commission within 15 working days after notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72053.

The commission or the director may bring an action for judicial relief from the director’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72054.

The commission shall reimburse the director for all expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his duties and responsibilities under this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the director’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72055.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member, to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he is alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission, and may exercise, all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or the disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member on the commission until a successor is qualified and elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72056.
